trunk/apertium-cy-en/apertium-cy-en.en.dix.xml
<pardef n="st/ave__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>aves</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ove</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                               <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>aved</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ove</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>aved</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>aving</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>aving</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>aving</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
     
    
<pardef n="st/eal__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>eal</l>
          <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>eal</l>
          <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>eals</l>
          <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ole</l>
          <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>olen</l>
          <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ealing</l>
          <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ealing</l>
          <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ealing</l>
          <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
        
    
<pardef n="step__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ped</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ped</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ping</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ping</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ping</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

    
<pardef n="st/ick__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ick</l>
          <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ick</l>
          <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>icks</l>
          <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>uck</l>
          <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>uck</l>
          <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>icking</l>
          <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>icking</l>
          <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>icking</l>
          <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
   
    
<pardef n="str/ike__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ike</l>
          <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ike</l>
          <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ikes</l>
          <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>uck</l>
          <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>uck</l>
          <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>iking</l>
          <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>iking</l>
          <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>iking</l>
          <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
   
    
<pardef n="sw/ell__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ell</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ell</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ells</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>elled</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>elled</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ollen</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>elling</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>elling</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>elling</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
  
    

                        <e lm="stop"><i>stop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="step into"><i>step</i><par n="step__vblex"/><p><l><b/>into</l><r><g><b/>into</g></r></p></e>
                        <e lm="wrap"><i>wrap</i> <par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="steal"><i>st</i> <par n="st/eal__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="lap"><i>lap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="drip"><i>drip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="prop"><i>prop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="overlap"><i>overlap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="stick"><i>st</i><par n="st/ick__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="step"><i>step</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="pop"><i>pop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="ship"><i>ship</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="top"><i>top</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="rip"><i>rip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="tap"><i>tap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="trap"><i>trap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="drop"><i>drop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="tip"><i>tip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="strip"><i>strip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="slip"><i>slip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="snap"><i>snap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
